Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5639.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5a. Not later than 90 days after the effective date of this section, the department shall develop an online tariffs calculator that is available on its website for individuals to input the individual's zip code, household income, spending habits, and other metrics as determined by the department to estimate the total costs and adverse impact of tariffs on the individual's own financial health. As used in this section, "tariffs" means any tariff levied by the United States government on another nation on or after January 20, 2025 or a tariff levied by a foreign government on the United States on or after January 20, 2025.